Tennessee, session 114, SB1229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-136, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting instead the following:
(b) By March 1, 2026, and by each March 1 thereafter, each LEA and public
charter school shall submit to the department of education documentation of its
compliance with this section in the manner prescribed by the commissioner.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1229
003334
- 1 -